src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns
быд+Pron:быд PRON-QNT_  "joka" ;
быдся+Pron:быдся PRON-QNT_  "joka" ;
быдсяма+Pron:быдсяма PRON-QNT_  "joka" ;
быдсӧн+Pron:быдсӧн PRONQ-COLL  "kaikki" ;
быдӧн+Pron:быдӧн PRONQ-COLL  "jokainen" ;
кыкӧн+Pron:кыкӧн PRONQ-COLL  "jokainen" ;
кымын+Adv:кымын PRON-QNT_  "kuinka monta" ;
мукӧд+Pron:мукӧд PRONQ-MUKOD  "muu" ;
мыйла+Adv:мыйла PRON-QNT_  "miksi" ;
мӧдар+Pron:мӧдар PRON-QNT_  "toinen" ;
мӧдар+Pron:мӧдар PRONQ-ATAG  "" ;
некодар+Pron:некодар PRON-NEG  "" ;
некоднан+Pron:некод PRON-NEG-COLL  "" ;
некодыр+Pron:некодыр PRON-NEG-End  "" ;
некор+Adv:некор PRON-NEG-End  "" ;
некутшӧм+Pron:некутшӧм PRON-NEG-A  "" ;
некутшӧма+Adv:некутшӧма PRON-NEG-ADV  "" ;
некыдз+Adv:некыдз PRON-NEG-End  "" ;
некыдзи+Adv:некыдзи PRON-NEG-End  "" ;
некымын+Adv:некымын PRON-NEG  "" ;
некымынлаын+Adv:некымынлаын PRON-NEG-IN_LA  "" ;
некымынысь+Adv:некымынысь PRON-NEG-ITER  "" ;
нем+Pron:нем PRON-NEG  "ei mitään" ;
немтор+Pron:немтор PRON-NEG_0/J  "" ;
неуна+Adv:неуна PRON-QNT_  "hieman" ;
нинӧкод+Pron:нинӧкод PRON-NEG  "" ;
нинӧкутшӧм+Pron:нинӧкутшӧм PRON-NEG-A  "" ;
нинӧм+Pron:нинӧм PRON-NEG  "" ;
нинӧмтор+Pron:нинӧмтор PRON-NEG_0/J  "" ;
ньӧти+Adv:ньӧти PRON-QNT_  "ei lainkaan" ;
став+Pron:став PRONQ-STAV  "kaikki" ;
ставӧн+Pron:ставӧн PRONQ-COLL  "kaikki" ;
сыа-мэа+Pron:сыа-мэа PRON-DUAL  "" ;
сымда+Adv:сымда PRON-QNT_  "" ;
сымда-мында+Adv:сымда-мында PRON-QNT_  "" ;
тэа-мэа+Pron:тэа-мэа PRON-DUAL  "" ;
унаӧн+Adv:унаӧн PRONQ-COLL  "monet" ;
этшаӧн+Pron:этшаӧн PRONQ-COLL  "harvat" ;
ӧтар+Pron:ӧтар PRONQ-ATAG  "toinen" ;
ӧтар-мӧдар+Pron:ӧтар-мӧдар PRONQ-ATAG  "" ;
ӧтмӧдар+Pron:ӧтмӧдар PRONQ-ATAG  "" ;
